Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 26

Effect of Authentication and Registration

66-26-101. Effect of instruments with or without registration.

All of the instruments mentioned in §66-24-101 shall have effect between the parties to the same, and their heirs and representatives, without registration; but as to other persons, not having actual notice of them, only from the noting thereof for registration on the books of the register, unless otherwise expressly provided.

Code 1858, § 2072 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, §§ 6, 12; 1841-1842, ch. 12, § 2); Shan., § 3749; Code 1932, § 7665; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2601.

Cross-References. Requirement of registration of deed as to strangers, §66-5-106.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 13; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 43; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 32, 38; 20 Tenn. Juris., Notice, § 6; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, §§ 2-5, 15; 22 Tenn. Juris., Specific Performance, § 11; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 40.

Law Reviews.

Recent Decision, The Tennessee Court of Appeals Interprets the Tennessee Recording Statutes, Gregg v. Link, (1989), 56 Tenn. L. Rev. 777 (1989).

66-26-102. Notice to all the world.

All of the instruments registered pursuant to §66-24-101 shall be notice to all the world from the time they are noted for registration, as prescribed in §8-13-108; and shall take effect from such time.

Code 1858, § 2073 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, §§ 6, 12; 1841-1842, ch. 12, § 2); Shan., § 3750; Code 1932, § 7666; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2602.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 12; 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, § 56; 3 Tenn. Juris., Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 23; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, §§ 10, 15.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 160, 193 (1978).

66-26-103. Unregistered instruments void as to creditors and bona fide purchasers.

Any instruments not so registered, or noted for registration, shall be null and void as to existing or subsequent creditors of, or bona fide purchasers from, the makers without notice.

Code 1858, § 2075 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, § 12; 1841-1842, ch. 12, § 2); Shan., § 3752; mod. Code 1932, § 7668; C. Supp. 1950, § 7668; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2603; Acts 2005, ch. 303, § 2.

Cross-References. Priority of registered instruments, §66-26-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 22; 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 8; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 32; 18 Tenn. Juris., Marriage Contracts and Settlements, § 7; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, §§ 2, 3, 6, 8.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-104. Rights as between transferee of decedent and purchaser from heir or devisee.

Any such instrument entitled to registration which is not duly registered prior to the expiration of sixty (60) days following the death of the maker of any such instrument shall be null and void as to innocent purchasers for a present valuable consideration from such person or persons as would, but for the execution of the instrument by the decedent, succeed to the rights of the decedent to such property in respect to which such unrecorded instrument was executed; provided, that the holder or any person entitled to the benefit of any such unrecorded instrument shall have a right of action against any such transferors for the reasonable value of any such property transferred, to the extent of the interest of the holder in the property, if brought within one (1) year of the recording of the instrument made by such transferors, if the instrument by which the transfer is made is required to be recorded for the protection of the purchaser under the laws of this state, otherwise the action shall be brought within one (1) year from the consummation of such sale or transfer.

Acts 1937, ch. 122, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7668; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2604; Acts 1987, ch. 276, § 1.

Cross-References. Unregistered instruments void as to creditors and bona fide purchasers, §66-26-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 22; 18 Tenn. Juris., Marriage Contracts and Settlements, § 7; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, §§ 3, 6, 8, 15.

Law Reviews.

Article Nine Deficiency Sales: The Windfall Factor (Mark Nelson Miller), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 475 (1977).

66-26-105. Priority of registered instruments.

Any instruments first registered or noted for registration shall have preference over one of earlier date, but noted for registration afterwards; unless it is proved in a court of equity, according to the rules of the court, that the party claiming under the subsequent instrument had full notice of the previous instrument.

Code 1858, § 2074 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, § 6; 1841-1842, ch. 12, § 2); Shan., § 3751; Code 1932, § 7667; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2605.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 98.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 20; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, §§ 5, 13, 15.

Law Reviews.

Recent Decision, The Tennessee Court of Appeals Interprets the Tennessee Recording Statutes, Gregg v. Link, (1989), 56 Tenn. L. Rev. 777 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. To the extent that it conflicts with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (UAPA), T.C.A. §67-1-105(d) is superseded by the UAPA, OAG 02-071, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (5/29/02).

66-26-106. Presumption as to validity of registration after twenty years.

Whenever a deed has been registered twenty (20) years or more, the same shall be presumed to have been properly acknowledged or proved, though the certificate of acknowledgement or probate has not been transferred to the registers book, and without regard to the form of the certificate; provided, that an acknowledgment to an instrument which has been of record in the register's office for a period of seven (7) years shall be presumed valid so as to comply with the form of acknowledgments set out in §§66-22-107 and66-22-108.

Code 1858, § 2084 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 26, § 9); Shan., § 3761; mod. Code 1932, § 7672; Acts 1969, ch. 200, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2606; Acts 2005, ch. 303, § 3.

Cross-References. Adverse possession under a registered conveyance, §§28-2-105 —28-2-107.

Presumption as to subscription by grantor after 30 years, §66-26-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 20; 9 Tenn. Juris., Deeds, § 14; 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 96; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 3; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 9.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-107. Presumption as to subscription by grantor after thirty years.

Where a deed has been registered more than thirty (30) years, but the register has failed to register the name of the grantor or bargainor, it shall be presumed that the name of the grantor or bargainor was subscribed to the deed, and the registration shall be good; and in proving the time when a deed has been registered, the date upon the books may be referred to; or the register may certify the fact as it appears upon the register's books; or the time of registration may be established by parol testimony.

Code 1858, § 2085 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 26, § 10); Shan., § 3762; Code 1932, § 7673; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2607.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-108. Presumption as to deeds by attorneys after twenty years' registration.

In all cases where a deed or deeds conveying real estate have been executed by any person or persons purporting to act as attorney or attorneys in fact, which deed or deeds have been registered, whether with or without proper probate or acknowledgment, or any probate or acknowledgment at all, twenty (20) years or more in the register's office of the county where the real estate is situated, or, if the land lay within the Indian territory at the time of the conveyance, if registered in the register's office of any county in the state, it shall be presumed, unless and until the contrary is shown, as it may be, that the conveyance was properly made by the attorney or attorneys in fact, and such deed or deeds, or certified copies from the register's books, shall be deemed valid to pass the legal title to real estate in the same manner as if the same had been executed by the principal or principals; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall affect the rights of creditors or purchasers for valuable consideration without notice.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 91, § 1; Shan., § 3764; mod. Code 1932, § 7675; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2608.

Cross-References. Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act, title 34, ch. 6, part 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 9.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-109. Presumption as to powers of attorney after twenty years.

When a power or powers of attorney authorizing the sale or conveyance of real estate have been registered, whether with or without proper probate or acknowledgment, or any probate or acknowledgment at all, twenty (20) years or more in the register's office of the county where the real estate is situated, or, if the land lay within the Indian territory, then if registered in the register's office of any county in the state, such power or powers of attorney shall be deemed good and valid in law to pass the estate conveyed by the attorney or attorneys in fact; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall affect the rights of creditors or purchasers for valuable consideration, without notice.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 91, § 2; Shan., § 3765; Code 1932, § 7676; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2609.

Cross-References. Registration of powers of attorney and revocation, §66-24-101.

Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act, title 34, ch. 6, part 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 100; 20 Tenn. Juris., Powers, § 3.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-110. Registered instruments as evidence — Presumptions and burden of proof regarding signatures on instruments.

Any instruments so proved or acknowledged, certified and registered, shall be received as evidence in any of the courts, judicial and administrative tribunals of the state, subject, nevertheless, to be impeached and proved to be a forgery, or to be otherwise inoperative, if the fact be so.

In an action with respect to an instrument, the authenticity of and authority to make each signature on the instrument is admitted, unless specifically denied in the pleadings. If the validity of a signature is denied in the pleadings, and if the instrument is not registered or is not properly acknowledged or proved, the burden of establishing validity is on the person claiming validity, but the signature is presumed to be authentic and authorized, unless:

The signer is dead or incompetent at the time of trial on the issue of validity of the signature; and

The instrument is unregistered or has been registered for fewer than twenty (20) years.

Under the presumption set forth in subsection (b), the trier of fact must find that the signature is authentic and authorized, unless evidence to the contrary is introduced.

Code 1858, § 2071 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, § 6); Shan., § 3748; mod. Code 1932, § 7664; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2610; Acts 2005, ch. 303, § 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, §§ 12, 24; 1 Tenn. Juris., Alternation of Instruments, § 20.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-111. Proof of instruments registered before 1839.

Every instrument authorized by law to be registered and proved or acknowledged, and registered prior to October 16, 1839, may be read in evidence:

Although the certificate only states that the deed was duly proved, without naming the subscribing witnesses by whom it was so proved; and in such case, the court shall presume that it was duly proved by all the subscribing witnesses, and the probate and registration shall be good, leaving it to the adverse party to disprove the fact;

Although the certificate is not and does not purport to be a transcript from the court minutes, if the certificate states enough to authorize the instrument to be registered; and in this case it shall be presumed that the entry on the minutes authorized the certificate by the clerk, unless the contrary be shown;

Although the certificate does not mention the term or style of the court at or in which the instrument was proved or acknowledged; and in this case, it shall be presumed that the instrument was proved or acknowledged in the court of which the person giving the certificate was clerk, and the certificate and registration shall be good, unless the contrary be shown;

Although the clerk, in the clerk's entry on the minutes and in the clerk's certificate on the document, has omitted to describe or mention the property; and in such case, the probate or acknowledgment and the registration shall be good;

Although the certificate only states that the deed was duly acknowledged, but not by whom; in which case, the instrument shall be presumed to have been acknowledged by the maker, and the acknowledgment and registration shall be good; and

No such probate or acknowledgment shall be void for want of sufficient certainty therein, if enough is contained on the face of it to identify the instrument to which it applies.

Code 1858, § 2086 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 26, § 9); Shan., § 3763; Code 1932, § 7674; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2611.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 17.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-112. Erroneous recital as to county where land located.

When a grant from the state for lands recites that the lands so granted are situated in one (1) county when they are in a different county, the grant shall be as valid as if the locality thereof were truly recited in the grant; and any subsequent conveyances of the lands in which they are stated to be situate in a different county from that in which they lie, may be registered in the county in which the lands lie, and such registration shall be valid as if the deeds of conveyance had correctly set forth the locality of the lands; provided, that nothing in this section and §§66-26-108 and66-26-109 shall affect the rights of creditors or purchasers without notice.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 91, § 3; Shan., § 3766; Code 1932, § 7677; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2612.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-113. Omission of words from certificate.

The unintentional omission by the clerk or other officer of any words in a certificate of an acknowledgment, or probate of any deed or other instrument, shall in nowise vitiate the validity of the deed, or other instrument or the acknowledgement or probate thereof, but the same shall be good and valid to all intents and purposes, if the substance of the authentication required by law is in the certificate.

Code 1858, § 2080 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 77); Shan., § 3757; mod. Code 1932, § 7669; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2613; Acts 2005, ch. 303, § 5.

Cross-References. Correction of errors in deed or registration, §66-5-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, §§ 8-18.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-114. Correction of omission.

If the omission is a matter of substance, the clerk or other officer, on application of either party interested, may correct such mistake or omission of words in such certificate on any such deed or other instrument.

Code 1858, § 2081 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 119, § 1); Shan., § 3758; Code 1932, § 7670; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2614.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, §§ 19, 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-115. Registration of correction.

The register shall record the correction in the proper book of the register's office, and make a reference to the same on the margin opposite the original registry of the certificate.

Code 1858, § 2083 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 119, § 3); Shan., § 3760; Code 1932, § 7671; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2615.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, §§ 18, 19, 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-26-116. Instruments granting, transferring, pledging or assigning lessors' interests in real property.

Upon registration, in the county where the real property lies, of any instrument granting, transferring, pledging or assigning the lessor's interest in leases or rents arising from real property, the interest of the grantee, transferee, pledgee or assignee shall be fully perfected as to the grantor, transferor, pledgor or assignor and all third parties without the necessity of furnishing notice to the assignor or lessee, obtaining possession of the real property, impounding the rents, securing the appointment of a receiver, or taking any other affirmative action, and shall have the priority provided for in this chapter.

The lessee is authorized to pay the assignor until the lessee receives notification that rents due or to become due have been assigned and that payment is to be made to the assignee. A notification that does not reasonably identify the rents assigned is ineffective. If requested by the lessee, the assignee must seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has been made and unless the assignee does so the lessee may pay the assignor.

Any registered instrument granting, transferring, pledging or assigning an interest in leases or rents arising from real property shall, upon satisfaction, be released as provided in chapter 25 of this title and shall be subject to the penalties provided in such chapter.

Acts 1989, ch. 213, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 9; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 14.